Tennessee, session 114, HB0588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-134, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (b) and redesignating the existing subsection (b) accordingly:
(b)
(1) It is an offense for a person to knowingly and with the intent to
conceal or misrepresent the identity of a firearm or antique firearm to:
(A) Alter, cover, deface, destroy, or remove the permanent serial
number, manufacturer's identification plate, or another permanent
distinguishing number from a firearm or antique firearm; or
(B) Sell, purchase, or possess such a firearm or antique firearm.
(2) A violation of this subsection (b) is a Class E felony, punishable by a
mandatory minimum sentence of one hundred eighty (180) days incarceration.
The defendant is not eligible for release from confinement until the defendant has
served the entire one-hundred-eighty-day mandatory minimum sentence.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0588
000907
- 1 -